Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.248

Effect of child care subsidy eligibility expansion—Use of existing resources.

Nothing in RCW 43.216.135 or * 43.216.136 requires a community or technical college to expand any of its existing child care facilities. Any additional child care services provided by a community or technical college as a result of RCW 43.216.135 or * 43.216.136 must be provided within existing resources and existing facilities.

[ 2021 c 199 s 502. Prior: 2020 c 355 s 4; 2020 c 279 s 3; 2019 c 406 s 71; 2019 c 97 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.216.136 was recodified as RCW 43.216.800 pursuant to 2024 c 67 s 10.

Short title—Findings—Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 199: See notes following RCW 43.216.770.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2020 c 355: See notes following RCW 43.216.135.

Effective date—2020 c 279: See note following RCW 43.216.800.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 97: See note following RCW 43.216.135.